Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8304
Control; presumption.

Control as used in the Discount Medical Plan Organization Act is presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly, owns, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing ten percent or more of the voting securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing made in the manner provided in subsection (11) of section 44-2132 that control does not exist in fact. The director may determine, after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard and making specific findings of fact to support the determination, that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 36.